Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202214-226
City council, officers, employees; extortion; soliciting bribe; violations; penalty.

(1) An officer or agent of a city of the metropolitan class shall not:

(a) Make a demand for money or other consideration of a franchised corporation or public contractor, or such corporation's or contractor's agents, with a threat to introduce or support a measure, or vote for or propose a resolution or ordinance, adverse to their interests, if such demand be not complied with; or

(b) Offer to prepare or introduce or support a resolution or ordinance favorable to such company or contractor for valuable consideration.

(2) A violation of this section shall be deemed a malfeasance in office, and upon conviction such offender shall be fined in any sum not exceeding five hundred dollars, and such officer shall be removed from office by direction of the court.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. II, § 23, p. 432;

C.S.1922, § 3549;

C.S.1929, § 14-224;

R.S.1943, § 14-226;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 56.
July 21, 2022